District of Columbia statutes.
41-138

Rules and regulations.

The Mayor is authorized to issue such rules, regulations, and orders as may be necessary in order to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-160, § 138, 27 DCR 5150
1981 Ed., § 42-238.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 38 of the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act (1981 Act).